Hawaii statutes.
[§321-192.5] Substance abuse treatment
monitoring program. (a) To determine the effectiveness of substance abuse
treatment services and maintain accurate numbers of individuals receiving
publicly funded substance abuse treatment, the department shall establish a
statewide substance abuse treatment monitoring program to collect the following
information from all treatment providers accredited by the department, pursuant
to section 321-198, on every individual who receives substance abuse treatment
paid by public funds. Treatment providers shall report admission and discharge
data, as determined by the department, with a final annual report due no later
than sixty days after the close of the fiscal year, which shall include:

(1) An accurate count of all admissions and
discharges during the reporting period;

(2) An unduplicated count of individuals served by
each treatment provider;

(3) Demographic data on each individual as determined
by the department, which may include age, race, ethnicity, employment status,
source of payment, source of referral to treatment, length of treatment, and
the primary substance for which treatment was sought;

(4) Data on the number of individuals who were
discharged due to successful completion of treatment and the reasons
individuals withdrew from treatment during the reporting period;

(5) Six-month follow-up data on persons who were
discharged due to successful completion of treatment, reporting on criteria for
measurement of successful treatment as determined by the department; and

(6) Any other information deemed relevant by the
department to assess the effectiveness of treatment on each individual.

(b) The department shall establish criteria to
measure the success of treatment for individuals and establish criteria to
determine whether the treatment provider is achieving success in treating
individuals with substance abuse. The department shall include in the contract
with the treatment provider all criteria to determine whether the treatment
provider is achieving success in treating individuals with substance abuse.

(c) The department shall include the
information under subsection (a) as part of the annual report to the
legislature under section 321-195.

(d) This section shall not be construed to
abrogate an individual's right to privacy. The department shall implement
sufficient protections to ensure that the identity of a recipient of substance
abuse treatment services remains strictly confidential and that aggregate data
collected pursuant to this section is used solely for the purpose of this
section. [L 2004, c 40, §24]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next